dictionaries/ru-ru.aff
SFX M Y 108
SFX M   ÞØÓÑ ËÕÔÓÑ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ÞØÓÑ ËÕÓØ         ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ÞØ   ËÕÔ          ÞØ
SFX M   ÞØ   ËÕ           ÞØ
SFX M   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÅÛØÓÑ       ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÅÔÓÑ        ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÅÔÅÓØ       ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÅÍÓÑ        ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÀÔÓÑ        ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÀÓØ         ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÙÔØ  ÏÅÛØ         ÙÔØ
SFX M   ÙÔØ  ÏÅÔÅ         ÙÔØ
SFX M   ÙÔØ  ÏÅÔ          ÙÔØ
SFX M   ÙÔØ  ÏÅÍ          ÙÔØ
SFX M   ÙÔØ  ÏÀÔ          ÙÔØ
SFX M   ÙÔØ  ÏÀ           ÙÔØ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  ÓÑ           ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  ÅÛØÓÑ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  ÅÔÓÑ         ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  ÅÔÅÓØ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  ÅÍÓÑ         ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  £ÛØÓÑ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  £ÔÓÑ         ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  £ÔÅÓØ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   ØÓÑ  £ÍÓÑ         ÞØÓÑ
SFX M   Ø    ÅÛØ          ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    ÅÔÅ          ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    ÅÔ           ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    ÅÍ           ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    £ÛØ          ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    £ÔÅ          ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    £Ô           ÞØ
SFX M   Ø    £Í           ÞØ
SFX M   ÕÔØÓÑ ÅÛØÓÑ        ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÕÔØÓÑ ÅÔÓÑ         ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÕÔØÓÑ ÅÔÅÓØ        ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÕÔØÓÑ ÅÍÓÑ         ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÕÔØ  Õ            ÕÔØ
SFX M   ÕÔØ  ÅÛØ          ÕÔØ
SFX M   ÕÔØ  ÅÔÅ          ÕÔØ
SFX M   ÕÔØ  ÅÔ           ÕÔØ
SFX M   ÕÔØ  ÅÍ           ÕÔØ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÓØ           ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÅÛØÓÑ        [ÁÅ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÅÔÓÑ         [ÁÅ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÅÔÅÓØ        [ÁÅ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÅÍÓÑ         [ÁÅ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÀÔÓÑ         [ÁÅ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØÓÑ ÀÓØ          [ÁÅ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÔØ   Ô            ÕÔØ
SFX M   ÔØ   ÅÛØ          [ÁÅ]ÔØ
SFX M   ÔØ   ÅÔÅ          [ÁÅ]ÔØ
SFX M   ÔØ   ÅÔ           [ÁÅ]ÔØ
SFX M   ÔØ   ÅÍ           [ÁÅ]ÔØ
SFX M   ÔØ   ÀÔ           [ÁÅ]ÔØ
SFX M   ÔØ   À            [ÁÅ]ÔØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÕÔÓÑ         [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÕÓØ          [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÅÛØÓÑ        [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÅÔÓÑ         [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÅÔÅÓØ        [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÅÍÓÑ         [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÄÕÔÓÑ        ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÄÕÓØ         ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÄÅÛØÓÑ       ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÄÅÔÓÑ        ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÄÅÔÅÓØ       ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ ÄÅÍÓÑ        ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ Ä£ÛØÓÑ       ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ Ä£ÔÓÑ        ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ Ä£ÔÅÓØ       ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ Ä£ÍÓÑ        ÊÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ £ÛØÓÑ        [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ £ÔÓÑ         [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ £ÔÅÓØ        [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉÓØ £ÍÓÑ         [ÓÚ]ÔÉÓØ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÕÔ           [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   Õ            [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÅÛØ          [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÅÔÅ          [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÅÔ           [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÅÍ           [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÄÕÔ          ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÄÕ           ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÄÅÛØ         ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÄÅÔÅ         ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÄÅÔ          ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   ÄÅÍ          ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   Ä£ÛØ         ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   Ä£ÔÅ         ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   Ä£Ô          ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   Ä£Í          ÊÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   £ÛØ          [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   £ÔÅ          [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   £Ô           [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÔÉ   £Í           [ÓÚ]ÔÉ
SFX M   ÏÔØÓÑ ÅÛØÓÑ        ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÏÔØÓÑ ÅÔÓÑ         ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÏÔØÓÑ ÅÔÅÓØ        ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÏÔØÓÑ ÅÍÓÑ         ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÏÔØÓÑ ÀÔÓÑ         ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÏÔØÓÑ ÀÓØ          ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX M   ÏÔØ  ÅÛØ          ÏÔØ
SFX M   ÏÔØ  ÅÔÅ          ÏÔØ
SFX M   ÏÔØ  ÅÔ           ÏÔØ
SFX M   ÏÔØ  ÅÍ           ÏÔØ
SFX M   ÏÔØ  ÀÔ           ÏÔØ
SFX M   ÏÔØ  À            ÏÔØ

SFX L Y 63
SFX L   ÞØÓÑ ËÓÑ          ÞØÓÑ
SFX L   ÞØÓÑ ËÓÑ          [^Å]ÞØÓÑ
SFX L   ÞØÓÑ ËÌÏÓØ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX L   ÞØÓÑ ËÌÉÓØ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX L   ÞØÓÑ ËÌÁÓØ        ÞØÓÑ
SFX L   ÞØ   ËÌÏ          ÞØ
SFX L   ÞØ   ËÌÉ          ÞØ
SFX L   ÞØ   ËÌÁ          ÞØ
SFX L   ÞØ   Ë            ÞØ
SFX L   ÞØ   Ë            [^Å]ÞØ
SFX L   ÚÔØ  Ú            ÚÔØ
SFX L   ÚÔÉ  Ú            ÚÔÉ
SFX L   ÔØÓÑ ÓÑ           ÚÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÔØÓÑ ÌÓÑ          [^ÓÚ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÔØÓÑ ÌÏÓØ         [^Ó]ÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÔØÓÑ ÌÉÓØ         [^Ó]ÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÔØÓÑ ÌÁÓØ         [^Ó]ÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÔØ   ÌÏ           [^Ó]ÔØ
SFX L   ÔØ   ÌÉ           [^Ó]ÔØ
SFX L   ÔØ   ÌÁ           [^Ó]ÔØ
SFX L   ÔØ   Ì            [^ÓÚ]ÔØ
SFX L   ÔÉ   ÌÏ           ÚÔÉ
SFX L   ÔÉ   ÌÉ           ÚÔÉ
SFX L   ÔÉ   ÌÁ           ÚÔÉ
SFX L   ÓÔØÓÑ ÌÓÑ          ÓÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÓÔØÓÑ ÌÏÓØ         ÓÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÓÔØÓÑ ÌÉÓØ         ÓÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÓÔØÓÑ ÌÁÓØ         ÓÔØÓÑ
SFX L   ÓÔØ  ÌÏ           [^Þ].ÓÔØ
SFX L   ÓÔØ  ÌÉ           [^Þ].ÓÔØ
SFX L   ÓÔØ  ÌÁ           [^Þ].ÓÔØ
SFX L   ÓÔØ  Ì            [^Þ].ÓÔØ
SFX L   ÓÔÉÓØ ÌÓÑ          ÓÔÉÓØ
SFX L   ÓÔÉÓØ ÌÓÑ          [^Å]ÓÔÉÓØ
SFX L   ÓÔÉÓØ ÌÏÓØ         ÓÔÉÓØ
SFX L   ÓÔÉÓØ ÌÉÓØ         ÓÔÉÓØ
SFX L   ÓÔÉÓØ ÌÁÓØ         ÓÔÉÓØ
SFX L   ÓÔÉ  ÌÏ           ÓÔÉ
SFX L   ÓÔÉ  ÌÉ           ÓÔÉ
SFX L   ÓÔÉ  ÌÁ           ÓÔÉ
SFX L   ÓÔÉ  Ì            ÓÔÉ
SFX L   ÓÔÉ  Ì            [^Å]ÓÔÉ
SFX L   ÓÑ   ÌÏÓØ         [^ÁÉÑØ]ÓÑ
SFX L   ÓÑ   ÌÉÓØ         [^ÁÉÑØ]ÓÑ
SFX L   ÓÑ   ÌÁÓØ         [^ÁÉÑØ]ÓÑ
SFX L   ÌÚÔÉ ÌÚ           ÌÚÔÉ
SFX L   ÅÞØÓÑ £ËÓÑ         ÅÞØÓÑ
SFX L   ÅÞØ  £Ë           ÅÞØ
SFX L   ÅÚÔÉ £Ú           ÅÚÔÉ
SFX L   ÅÓÔØ ÌÏ           ÞÅÓÔØ
SFX L   ÅÓÔØ ÌÉ           ÞÅÓÔØ
SFX L   ÅÓÔØ ÌÁ           ÞÅÓÔØ
SFX L   ÅÓÔØ ÅÌ           ÞÅÓÔØ
SFX L   ÅÓÔØ £Ì           ÞÅÓÔØ
SFX L   ÅÓÔÉÓØ £ÌÓÑ         ÅÓÔÉÓØ
SFX L   ÅÓÔÉ £Ì           ÅÓÔÉ
SFX L   ÁÓØ  ÏÓØ          ÁÓØ
SFX L   ÁÓØ  ÉÓØ          ÁÓØ
SFX L   Á    Ï            Á
SFX L   Á    É            Á
SFX L   0    ÌÏ           [^ÁÉÑØ]
SFX L   0    ÌÉ           [^ÁÉÑØ]
SFX L   0    ÌÁ           [^ÁÉÑØ]

SFX K Y 55
SFX K   ÝÅ   Ý            ÝÅ
SFX K   ØÅ   ÉÊ           ØÅ
SFX K   Ø    ÑÍÉ          Ø
SFX K   Ø    ÑÍ           Ø
SFX K   Ø    ÑÈ           Ø
SFX K   Ø    Ñ            Ø
SFX K   Ø    É            Ø
SFX K   Ø    ÅÍ           Ø
SFX K   Ø    ÅÊ           Ø
SFX K   Ø    Å            Ø
SFX K   Ø    À            Ø
SFX K   Ï    Õ            Ï
SFX K   Ï    É            [ÉÛÞ]ËÏ
SFX K   Ï    Å            Ï
SFX K   Ï    ÁÍÉ          Ï
SFX K   Ï    ÁÍ           Ï
SFX K   Ï    ÁÈ           Ï
SFX K   Ï    Á            Ï
SFX K   Ï    0            [ÄÇÓÔ×]Ï
SFX K   Ê    ÑÍÉ          Ê
SFX K   Ê    ÑÍ           Ê
SFX K   Ê    ÑÈ           Ê
SFX K   Ê    Ñ            Ê
SFX K   Ê    É            ÉÊ
SFX K   Ê    É            [ÀÁÅÏÑÕ]Ê
SFX K   Ê    Å×           Ê
SFX K   Ê    ÅÍ           Ê
SFX K   Ê    Å            [^É]Ê
SFX K   Ê    À            Ê
SFX K   Å    Õ            [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    ÑÍÉ          [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    ÑÍ           [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    ÑÈ           [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    Ñ            [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    Ê            ÉÅ
SFX K   Å    É            ÉÅ
SFX K   Å    ÅÊ           [^ÃÉÖØÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    ÁÍÉ          [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    ÁÍ           [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    ÁÈ           [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    Á            [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   Å    À            [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX K   0    Ù            [^ÅÇÈÊËÏÖØÛÝÞ]
SFX K   0    Õ            [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX K   0    Ï×           [^ÃÅÊÏÖØÛÝÞ]
SFX K   0    ÏÍ           [^ÃÅÊÏÖØÛÝÞ]
SFX K   0    Í            Ï
SFX K   0    Í            Å
SFX K   0    É            [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]
SFX K   0    ÅÊ           [ÖÛÝÞ]
SFX K   0    Å            [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX K   0    ÁÍÉ          [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX K   0    ÁÍ           [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX K   0    ÁÈ           [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX K   0    Á            [^ÅÊÏØ]
